Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska79-1034
School funds; collection of fines
and other school money; duties
of county treasurer.

The county treasurer shall
collect or cause to be collected the fines and all money for school purposes
in his or her county. The county
treasurer shall pay over to the State Treasurer all funds and money, from
whatever source derived, belonging to the general school fund in his or her
hands and make a settlement thereof with the State Treasurer.

Laws 1881, c. 78, subdivision XI, § 2, p. 368;

R.S.1913, § 6929;

C.S.1922, § 6512;

C.S.1929, § 79-2001;

R.S.1943, § 79-2001;

Laws 1949, c. 256, § 376, p. 816;

Laws 1965, c. 459, § 23, p. 1463;

R.S.1943, (1994), § 79-1301;

Laws 1996, LB 900, § 680;

Laws 2008, LB914, § 25;

Laws 2014, LB792, § 1.